Colorado, session 2026A, HB1207.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 7-90-501, amend (1)
introductory portion; and add (1)(f), (1.5), and (9) as follows:
7-90-501. Periodic reports - definitions.
(1) Each reporting entity shall deliver to the secretary of state, for
filing pursuant to part 3 of this article ARTICLE 90, a periodic report that
states the entity name of the reporting entity, the jurisdiction under the law
of which the reporting entity is formed, and:
(f) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, IF THE REPORTING ENTITY IS AN
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

EMPLOYER, EEO-1 DATA.
(1.5) AN EMPLOYER SHALL PROVIDE THE EEO-1 DATA REQUIRED BY
SUBSECTION (1)(f) OF THIS SECTION IN THE EMPLOYER'S PERIODIC REPORT TO
THE SECRETARY OF STATE EVEN IF THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT REPEALS OR
DISCONTINUES THE FEDERAL REQUIREMENT TO SUBMIT THE EEO-1 DATA TO
THE UNITED STATES EQUAL EMPLOYMENT OPPORTUNITY COMMISSION.
(9) AS USED IN THIS SECTION:
(a) "EEO-1 DATA" MEANS DEMOGRAPHIC WORKFORCE DATA
COLLECTED THROUGH THE UNITED STATES EQUAL EMPLOYMENT
OPPORTUNITY COMMISSION'S "EMPLOYER INFORMATION REPORT", FEDERAL
FORM EEO-1, AS THAT FORM EXISTED ON MARCH 1, 2026, THAT
CATEGORIZES EMPLOYEES BY RACE, ETHNICITY, GENDER, AND JOB
CATEGORY.
(b) (I) "EMPLOYER" MEANS A PRIVATE SECTOR ENTITY CONDUCTING
BUSINESS IN THE STATE THAT EMPLOYS ONE HUNDRED OR MORE WORKERS
AND THAT, AS OF MARCH 1, 2026, IS REQUIRED TO SUBMIT EEO-1 DATA TO
THE UNITED STATES EQUAL EMPLOYMENT OPPORTUNITY COMMISSION.
(II) "EMPLOYER" DOES NOT INCLUDE THE STATE, A LOCAL
GOVERNMENT, THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, A SCHOOL DISTRICT, A STATE
INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION, OR A QUASI-GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY
OR POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE.
(c) "WORKER" MEANS EMPLOYEE AS DEFINED IN SECTION 8-4-101
(5).
SECTION 2. Appropriation. (1) For the 2026-27 state fiscal year,
$43,210 is appropriated to the department of state. This appropriation is
from the department of state cash fund created in section 24-21-104 (3)(b),
C.R.S. To implement this act, the department may use this appropriation as
follows:
(a) $18,930 for use by the business and licensing division for
personal services, which amount is based on an assumption that the division
will require an additional 0.5 FTE;
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1207

(b) $5,250 for use by the business and licensing division for
operating expenses;
(c) $16,640 for use by the information technology division for
personal services;
(d) $2,390 for use by the information technology division for
operating expenses.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1207

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1207